Idaho, session 2025, H0385.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 17, Title 54, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 54-1740, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
54-1740. AFFORDABLE ACCESS TO PRESCRIPTION DRUGS. (1) As used in this
section:
(a) "340B drug" means a covered outpatient drug under 42 U.S.C. 256b(b)
that has been subject to an offer for reduced prices by a pharmaceutical
manufacturer under 42 U.S.C. 256b(a)(1).
(b) "Contract pharmacy" means a pharmacy that is registered with the
340B office of pharmacy affairs information system, or a successor sys-
tem, under contract with a covered entity, and authorized under such
contract to receive and dispense 340B drugs on behalf of the covered en-
tity.
(c) "Covered entity" means a covered entity as defined in 42 U.S.C.
256b(a)(4) participating or authorized to participate in the federal
340B drug pricing program pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 256b.
(d) "Pharmaceutical manufacturer" means an entity, agent, or affiliate
of such an entity that manufactures drugs, biologics, or other pharma-
ceutical products.
(e) "Pharmacy" means any place located within this state where drugs
are dispensed and pharmacy services are provided and any place outside
of this state where drugs are dispensed and pharmacy services are pro-
vided to residents who are physically located in this state.
(2) A pharmaceutical manufacturer shall not deny, restrict, prohibit,
or otherwise interfere with, either directly or indirectly, the acquisition
of a 340B drug by or delivery of a 340B drug to a contract pharmacy on behalf
of a covered entity.
(3) A pharmaceutical manufacturer shall not interfere with or other-
wise restrict a pharmacy contract between a covered entity and any contract
pharmacy.
(4) A pharmaceutical manufacturer shall not, either directly or indi-
rectly, require a covered entity or contract pharmacy to submit, validate,
certify, or provide any claims, utilization, purchasing, or other data as
a condition for allowing the acquisition of a 340B drug by or delivery of a
340B drug to a covered entity or contract pharmacy. This prohibition does
not include pharmaceutical manufacturer audits that pertain directly to a


covered entity's compliance with 42 U.S.C. 256b(a)(5)(A)(i) or 42 U.S.C.
256b(a)(5)(B) conducted in accordance with procedures established by the
secretary of the department of health and human services.
(5) Nothing in this section shall be construed or applied to be less re-
strictive than applicable federal law for a person or entity regulated by
this section. Nothing in this section shall be construed or applied to be in
conflict with applicable federal law and related regulations or other laws
of this state if the state law is compatible with applicable federal law.
Limited distribution of a drug required under 21 U.S.C. 355-1 shall not be
construed as a violation of this section.
(6) The provisions of this section are hereby declared to be severable
and if any provision of this section or the application of such provision to
any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason, such declara-
tion shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of this section.
(7) If the 340B drug pricing program described in 42 CFR 10 is elim-
inated at the federal level, then the provisions of this section shall be
null, void, and of no force and effect.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.